Utah statutes.
58-26a-306.   Examination requirements.
(1)  Before taking the qualifying examinations, an applicant shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form approved by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  demonstrate completion of the education requirement in Subsection
58-26a-302(1)(d); and
(d)  be approved by the board to take the qualifying examinations.
(2)  A person must sit for and meet the conditioning requirements of the AICPA
Uniform CPA Examination as established by the AICPA.
